Illinois, session 104th, SB2392.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-80 new)7    Sec. 10-80. Illinois Guaranteed Income Fund.8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:9    "Eligible entity" means either of the following:10        (1) A city, county, or city and county.11        (2) A nonprofit organization that is exempt from 12    federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 13    501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 14    amended.15    "Guaranteed Income" means periodic, unconditional cash 16payments directly to individuals. A guaranteed income is not 17universal and is meant to prioritize cash based on need.18    (b) The Illinois Guaranteed Income Fund is created as a 19special fund in the State treasury. The Fund shall consist of 20all moneys appropriated to the Department and all interest 21earned on moneys in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be 22expended for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of 23this Section and for no other purpose. Subject to   SB2392- 2 -LRB104 11032 KTG 21114 b1appropriation, the Department of Human Services shall 2administer the Fund and provide grants to eligible entities 3for the purpose of operating pilot programs and programs, or 4"projects", that provide a guaranteed income to participants. 5The Department shall prioritize funding for projects that 6serve Illinois residents who:7        (1) are pregnant individuals or have become new 8    parents in the last 3 years;9        (2) are facing homelessness or seeking shelter or 10    transitioning to housing after a period of homelessness;11        (3) are formerly incarcerated and returning to the 12    community, or supporting a formerly incarcerated family 13    member who was released within a year of application; or14        (4) are enrolled in educational or vocational 15    programs.16    (c) The Department may, at its discretion, provide grants 17to projects that provide a guaranteed income to populations 18other than those prioritized in subsection (b). The 19Department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall 20determine the methodology for, and manner of, distributing 21grants awarded in accordance with this Section. In determining 22the methodology and manner of distributing grants, the 23Department shall ensure that grant funds are awarded in an 24equitable manner to eligible entities in both rural and urban 25counties and in proportion to the number of individuals 26anticipated to be served by an eligible entity's pilot program   SB2392- 3 -LRB104 11032 KTG 21114 b1or project.2    (d) In order to receive grant funds, an eligible entity 3shall present a plan for providing all individuals who receive 4guaranteed income payments funded with a grant provided under 5this Section with sufficient benefits counseling and 6informational materials to ensure that they are aware of any 7impact the receipt of a guaranteed income payment from the 8pilot program or project may have on their eligibility for 9other public benefit programs, if applicable.10    (e)(1) The Department shall review and evaluate the 11projects funded under this Section to determine, at a minimum, 12the economic impact of the programs and projects and their 13impact on the outcomes of individuals, as described in the 14original grant application, who receive guaranteed income 15payments funded with a grant provided under this Section. The 16Department shall consult with stakeholders and staff on the 17details of, and data components to include in, the evaluation, 18as well as any other topics to be addressed by the review and 19evaluation, in advance of any decision to grant to a project. 20The Department may accept, expend, or include in 21consideration, funds from any source, public or private, for 22the review and evaluation.23    (2) The Department shall submit a report to the General 24Assembly regarding the review and evaluation conducted under 25paragraph (1). The report shall be submitted to the General 26Assembly no later than July 1, 2028. A copy of the report shall   SB2392- 4 -LRB104 11032 KTG 21114 b1be posted on the Department's website.2    (f) Upon allocation of funding to eligible entities, as 3described in this Section, the Department shall report to the 4General Assembly, and post publicly on its website, 5information about the projects funded, including which 6specific eligible entities received grants, the expected 7number of individuals receiving guaranteed income payments 8funded with a grant provided under this Section, 9characteristics of the populations receiving guaranteed income 10payments funded with a grant provided under this Section, and 11the length of time each guaranteed income project will be 12administered.13    (g) The Department may establish an appropriate method, 14process, and structure for grant management, fiscal 15accountability, payments to guaranteed income pilot 16participants, and technical assistance and supports for 17grantees that ensure transparency and accountability in the 18use of State funds. The Department may, at its discretion, 19contract with one or more third parties for these purposes.20    (h) The Department may, at its discretion, contract with a 21third-party vendor for the purpose of developing a benefits 22counseling tool or informational materials for use by grantees 23to assist in meeting the requirements of this Section.24    (i) The Department may, at its discretion, require 25grantees to use a specified third-party vendor for purposes of 26administering grantees' projects and to meet the requirements   SB2392- 5 -LRB104 11032 KTG 21114 b1of this Section.2    (j) The Department may adopt rules as necessary to 3implement this Section. 4    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Illinois Guaranteed Income Fund. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.